Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 4 Swine Mycobacteriosis Indemnification

4-4-140.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Georgia Swine Mycobacteriosis Indemnification Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 1.

4-4-141.
Purpose of article.

Swine mycobacteriosis poses a serious potential health threat to the people of this state. The swine farmers of this state have experienced and are experiencing serious economic losses due to the condemnation of swine infected with mycobacteriosis under the laws of this state. It is in the best interest of this state to seek the speedy eradication of swine mycobacteriosis in this state, while ensuring a supply of swine meat products in this state, and to provide for indemnification to those persons having swine condemned because such swine are infected with swine mycobacteriosis.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 2.

4-4-142.
Definitions.

As used in this article, all terms shall have the meanings ascribed to them in Code Section 26-2-62.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 3.

4-4-143.
Indemnification for condemned swine — Generally.

The Commissioner is authorized to pay to any animal food manufacturer the actual cost paid by such animal food manufacturer for any swine condemned by reason of infection with swine mycobacteriosis.

In the event that swine infected with mycobacteriosis are passed after inspection under restriction of cooking, the payment authorized by this article may equal but shall not exceed 75 percent of the actual cost paid for such swine.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 4.

4-4-144.
Indemnification for condemned swine — Proof of Georgia origin required.

No payment shall be made under this article unless the party receiving such payment shall first provide such proof as is satisfactory to the Commissioner that the swine for which payment is being made originated from a Georgia farm and that payment to the farmer for such swine has not and shall not be reduced by reason of the condemnation of such swine.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 5.

4-4-145.
Indemnification for condemned swine — Cooperation of person receiving payment required.

No payment shall be made under this article unless the person receiving such payment shall first sign, in a form agreeable to the Commissioner, an agreement to comply with the recommendations of the Commissioner for the control and eradication of swine mycobacteriosis.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 6.

4-4-146.
Indemnification for condemned swine — Release required.

No payment shall be made under this article unless the person receiving such payment shall first sign, in a form agreeable to the Commissioner, an agreement that the payment made under this article is accepted as payment in full for the swine for which such payment is made.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 7.

4-4-147.
Elimination of disease at farm of origin.

The Animal Industry Division of the department shall take all steps necessary or appropriate to eliminate swine mycobacteriosis from the farm of origin of the swine for which compensation is paid under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 11.

4-4-148.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate, from time to time, such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purpose of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 8.

4-4-149.
Cooperation among state and federal agencies.

The department is authorized and directed to cooperate with and seek the cooperation of all appropriate state and federal agencies in administering this article. The Commissioner is authorized and directed to take all steps reasonably necessary to ascertain whether any federal funds are or may become available to carry out the purposes of this article and, in the event that such funds are or become available, is authorized and directed to take all reasonable steps necessary to obtain and accept such funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 9; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 4/HB 79.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “The department” for “The State Department of Agriculture” in the first sentence.

4-4-150.
Conduct of scientific research.

Scientific research necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article shall be carried out under the direction of the Advisory Board of the College of Veterinary Medicine of the University of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 10.

4-4-151.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this article and notwithstanding the existence of any adequate remedy at law, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior court for an injunction. Such court shall have jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction, or both, restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this article or for failing or refusing to comply with the requirements of this article or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner under this article. An injunction issued under this Code section shall not require a bond.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-4-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 361, § 2.